Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB54.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall recognize and allow dual credit students receiving directly related on-the-job training
equivalencies of internship and cooperative placement hours to count toward the hours necessary to obtain
licensure in a profession regulated by the department, including but not limited to electrician, plumbing,
and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning licenses.
(2) The maximum equivalencies to count toward licensure under subsection (1) of this section shall be:
(a) For electrician licenses, up to four thousand (4,000) hours in accordance with KRS 227A.060;
(b) For plumber licenses, up to two (2) years; and
(c) For heating, ventilation, and air conditioning licenses, up to three thousand (3,000) hours.
(3) The department shall establish a reporting system under this section through the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) The department shall utilize the current administrative regulations governing licensure attainment to
determine the eligibility and applicability of directly related on-the-job training hours, ensuring alignment
with existing licensure requirements and standards.
Signed by Governor March 19, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version